tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_uk_UA.dic
розо4реш
розо4рн
руко5с4тиск
само3у4ч
сан4к4т3
сво4єкорис
сво4єрід
сво4єчас
сеї4д
серцеї4д
сор4тн
соці4о
спе4ц3ві4д3
спе4ц3кур
спе4ц3мон
спе4ц3с
спе4цпр
співві4д3
спор4т3вир
спор4т3зал
спор4т3клуб
спор4т3ком
спор4т3май
спор4т4с3ме
стат5упр
су3м'4я
супер3а4варі
супер3е4фект
супер3о4браз
сь4квуг
те4одоліт
те4олог
те4ософ
те4х3ві4д3
тор4г3пред
тран4с3
тур4к3мен
у1
у2й
у3в'4я
у3м'4я
у4к4р
убої4д
уі3в'4є
уі3в'4ю
укр3а4вт
укр3а4гр
укр3е4кс
укр3і4н4банк
уя4в
фізі4о
фо4р4с4т3мейст
х3о4кисл
хво4є3г4риз
хімі4о
хо4р3мейст
ц3а4наліз
цен4т4р3енерг
цук3ро
чорно3б4рив
шапі4т3мейст
шта4л3мейст
ю1
ю2й
я1
я2й
я3і4стор
яа4варі
яе4місі
ясої4д
ь6о
